Utah statutes.
48-1-30 (Repealed 07/01/13).   General effect of dissolution on authority of partner.

Except so far as may be necessary to wind up partnership affairs or to complete transactions begun but not then finished, dissolution terminates all authority of any partner to act for the partnership.

(1)  With respect to the partners:

(a)  when the dissolution is not by the act, bankruptcy or death of a partner; or

(b)  when the dissolution is by such act, bankruptcy or death of a partner in cases where Section 48-1-31 so requires.

(2)  With respect to persons not partners as declared in Section 48-1-32.



No Change Since 1953 

Repealed by Chapter 353, 2011 General Session

